Utah statutes.
53-1-113.   Office of Executive Protection -- Personnel.

(1)  The commissioner shall select personnel for the Office of Executive Protection primarily from the ranks of the  Highway Patrol without competitive examination.

(2)  Selection of personnel from other than these ranks may be made at the commissioner's discretion, provided the persons selected are peace officers.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 234, 1993 General Session

